Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2323.02
Direct rollover;
terms, defined; distributee; powers; board; duties.

(1)
For purposes of this section and section 23-2323.03:

(a) Distributee means the member, the member's surviving spouse,
or the member's former spouse who is an alternate payee under a qualified
domestic relations order as defined in section 414(p) of the Internal Revenue
Code;

(b) Direct rollover means a payment by the retirement system
to the eligible retirement plan or plans specified by the distributee;

(c) Eligible retirement plan means (i) an individual retirement
account described in section 408(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, (ii) an
individual retirement annuity described in section 408(b) of the code, except
for an endowment contract, (iii) a qualified plan described in section 401(a)
of the code, (iv) an annuity plan described in section 403(a) or 403(b) of
the code, (v) except for purposes
of section 23-2323.03, an individual retirement plan described in section
408A of the code, and (vi) a plan described in section
457(b) of the code and maintained by a governmental employer. For eligible
rollover distributions to a surviving spouse, an eligible retirement plan
means subdivisions (1)(c)(i) through (vi) of this section; and

(d) Eligible rollover distribution means any distribution
to a distributee of all or any portion of the balance to the credit of the
distributee in the plan, except such term shall not include any distribution
which is one of a series of substantially equal periodic payments, not less
frequently than annually, made for the life of the distributee or joint lives
of the distributee and the distributee's beneficiary or for the specified
period of ten years or more and shall not include any distribution to the
extent such distribution is required under section 401(a)(9) of the Internal
Revenue Code.

(2) For distributions made to a distributee on or after January
1, 1993, a distributee may elect to have any portion of an eligible rollover
distribution paid directly to an eligible retirement plan specified by the
distributee.

(3) A member's
surviving spouse or former spouse who is an alternate payee under a qualified
domestic relations order and, on or after January 1, 2010, any designated
beneficiary of a member who is not a surviving spouse or former spouse who
is entitled to receive an eligible rollover distribution from the retirement
system may, in accordance with such rules, regulations, and limitations as
may be established by the board, elect to have such distribution made in the
form of a direct transfer to a retirement plan eligible to receive such transfer
under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code.

(4) An eligible rollover
distribution on behalf of a designated beneficiary of a member who is not
a surviving spouse or former spouse of the member may be transferred to an
individual retirement account or annuity described in section 408(a) or section
408(b) of the Internal Revenue Code that is established for the purpose of
receiving the distribution on behalf of the designated beneficiary and that
will be treated as an inherited individual retirement account or individual
retirement annuity described in section 408(d)(3)(C) of the Internal Revenue
Code.

(5) The board shall adopt
and promulgate rules and regulations for direct rollover procedures which
are consistent with section 401(a)(31) of the Internal Revenue Code and which
include, but are not limited to, the form and time of direct rollover distributions.

Laws 1996, LB 847, § 8;

Laws 2002, LB 407, § 7;

Laws 2012, LB916, § 13.
April 7, 2012